Indiana, session 2026, HB1333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-1.2-12-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.166-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The authority shall do the following under
this chapter:
(1) Be responsible for the management of all aspects of the
Indiana brownfields program.
(2) Prepare and provide program information.
(3) Negotiate the negotiable aspects of each financial assistance
agreement.
(4) Sign each financial assistance agreement.
(5) Review each proposed project and financial assistance
agreement to determine if the project meets the credit, economic,
or fiscal criteria established by guidelines of the authority.
(6) Periodically inspect or cause to be inspected projects to
determine compliance with this chapter.
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


(7) Conduct or cause to be conducted an evaluation concerning
the financial ability of a private individual or entity, nonprofit
entity, or political subdivision to:
(A) pay a loan or other financial assistance and other
obligations evidencing loans or other financial assistance, if
required to be paid; and
(B) otherwise comply with terms of the financial assistance
agreement.
(8) Evaluate or cause to be evaluated the technical aspects of the
private individual or entity, nonprofit entity, or political
subdivision's:
(A) environmental assessment of potential brownfield
properties;
(B) proposed remediation; and
(C) remediation activities conducted on brownfield properties.
(9) Inspect or cause to be inspected remediation activities
conducted under this chapter.
(10) Act as a liaison to the United States Environmental
Protection Agency regarding the Indiana brownfields program.
(11) Be a point of contact for private entities, nonprofit entities,
and political subdivisions concerning questions about the Indiana
brownfields program.
(12) Enter into memoranda of understanding, as necessary, with
the department of environmental management and the budget
agency concerning the administration and management of the
Indiana brownfields fund and the Indiana brownfields program.
(b) The authority may do the following under this chapter:
(1) Undertake activities to make private environmental insurance
products available to encourage and facilitate the cleanup and
redevelopment of brownfield properties.
(2) Enter into agreements with private entities, nonprofit entities,
and political subdivisions to manage any of the following
conducted on brownfield properties:
(A) Environmental assessment activities.
(B) Environmental remediation activities.
(C) Demolition and clearance activities.
(c) The authority may:
(1) negotiate with;
(2) select; and
(3) contract with;
one (1) or more insurers to provide insurance products as described in
subsection (b)(1).
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


(d) The authority may:
(1) negotiate with;
(2) select; and
(3) contract with;
one (1) or more environmental consultants to undertake the activities
described in subsection (b)(2) for the benefit of private entities,
nonprofit entities, and political subdivisions.
(e) Notwithstanding IC 13-23, IC 13-24-1, and IC 13-25-4, the
authority is not liable for any contamination addressed by the authority
under an agreement under subsection (b)(2) unless existing
contamination on the brownfield is exacerbated due to gross negligence
or intentional misconduct by the authority.
(f) For purposes of subsection (e), reckless, willful, or wanton
misconduct constitutes gross negligence.
(g) The authority is and a private entity or nonprofit entity that
have executed an agreement under subsection (b)(2) are entitled to
the same governmental immunity afforded a political subdivision under
IC 34-13-3-3(a)(22) for any act taken to investigate or remediate
hazardous substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
brownfield under an the agreement under subsection (b)(2).
(h) This chapter does not require the authority to provide a loan or
other financial assistance to any private individual or entity, nonprofit
entity, or political subdivision to the extent the authority determines
that providing the loan or other financial assistance is not in the best
interests of the Indiana brownfields program and the authority.
SECTION 2. IC 6-2.5-15-0.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.2. (a) Notwithstanding any
other provision in this chapter, the corporation may not issue a
new specific transaction award certificate under this chapter after
June 30, 2026.
(b) Subsection (a) may not be construed to affect the terms of a
specific transaction award certificate issued under this chapter
before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. IC 8-1-8.2-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "development owner"
means a person that proposes to construct an onsite energy offtake
development.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-8.2-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "electric generation
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


or storage facility" means:
(1) a facility; or
(2) infrastructure associated with a facility;
for the generation or storage of electricity.
(b) The term includes a utility scale battery energy storage
system that is:
(1) co-located on the same premises as a facility for the
generation of electricity; or
(2) installed as a standalone system with an independent
connection to the electrical grid.
(b) (c) The term does not include the following:
(1) A wind power device (as defined in IC 8-1-41-7).
(2) A commercial solar energy system (as defined in IC 8-1-42-2).
SECTION 5. IC 8-1-8.2-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. As used in this chapter, "onsite energy offtake
development", or "OEO development", means a commercial or
industrial development:
(1) that will be located on a premise of land in an energy
production zone on which will be also be located an energy
generation or storage facility with respect to which the
commission has declined jurisdiction under IC 8-1-8.5-5;
(2) that will be equipped with, or make use of, water saving
technologies that will significantly reduce the development's
water consumption; and
(3) with respect to which the development owner has
committed through:
(A) an offtake agreement;
(B) a power purchase agreement; or
(C) a similar contractual arrangement;
to purchase a specified amount of energy or capacity from the
energy generation or storage facility;
under the terms of an economic development agreement executed
with a unit.
SECTION 6. IC 8-1-8.2-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "premise of land"
means property comprising a tract of land on which a project owner
proposes to construct an electric generation or storage facility,
including land within the perimeter of the tract of land that was not
owned by the project owner as of January 1, 2025.
SECTION 7. IC 8-1-8.2-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2025,
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "project owner" means
a person that proposes to construct an electric generation or storage
facility.
SECTION 8. IC 8-1-8.2-8.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.2. As used in this chapter, "utility scale battery
energy storage system" has the meaning set forth in IC 22-14-8-3.
SECTION 9. IC 8-1-8.2-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A project owner is not required to obtain
a permit, or any other land use or zoning approval, from a local
authority for the construction of an electric generation or storage
facility if:
(1) the commission:
(A) grants the project owner a certificate under IC 8-1-8.5-2
for the construction; or
(B) declines jurisdiction over the construction under
IC 8-1-2.5-5;
(2) the electric generating or storage facility will be located on
a premise of land that is an energy production zone; and
(3) the project owner complies with subsections (b) and (c).
(b) Not later than two hundred seventy (270) days before beginning
construction to which subsection (a) applies, a project owner shall
provide notice of the construction to the local authority with planning
authority under IC 36-7 for the premise of land on which the
construction will occur. The notice must include the following
information with regard to the construction and the electric generation
or storage facility to be constructed:
(1) A comprehensive description of the electric generation or
storage facility, including the following:
(A) The planned generation or storage capacity of the electric
generation or storage facility, expressed in megawatts.
(B) The energy source or technology that will be used by the
electric generation or storage facility to generate or store
electricity.
(C) The expected operational lifespan of the electric
generation or storage facility.
(2) The expected date on which the construction will begin.
(3) The expected date on which the electric generation or storage
facility will begin operation.
(4) Whether the electric generation or storage facility will be
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


used to provide retail electric service, wholesale electric service,
or both.
(5) The project owner's plan for eventual decommissioning of the
planned electric generation or storage facility.
(6) If construction of the electric generation or storage facility
will entail decommissioning an existing electric generation
facility that is located on the premise of land on which the electric
generation or storage facility will be located, the project owner's
plan for decommissioning the existing electric generation facility,
including financial assurances for the decommissioning.
(7) A detailed site plan that includes the location of the following
within or adjacent to the premise of land on which the electric
generation or storage facility will be constructed:
(A) The structures associated with the electric generation or
storage facility.
(B) The:
(i) existing electric generation facility, and any structures
associated with the existing electric generation facility; or
(ii) surface or underground mine, and any structures
associated with the surface or underground mine;
located on the premise of land on which the electric generation
or storage facility will be located.
(C) Existing and proposed access roads.
(D) Regulated drains or ditches.
(E) Flood plains.
(F) Wetlands.
(G) Historic sites or other areas of cultural or environmental
significance.
(H) An OEO development, if applicable.
(8) An economic development plan detailing the expected
economic effect of the electric generation or storage facility on
the unit within which the electric generation or storage facility
will be located, including the following:
(A) The anticipated number and types of jobs to be created:
(i) during the construction of the electric generation or
storage facility; and
(ii) in the operation of the electric generation or storage
facility.
(B) The estimated property tax revenue the electric generation
or storage facility will produce for the unit.
(C) An estimate of the overall:
(i) cost to the unit; and
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


(ii) effect on the unit's revenue;
associated with the electric generation or storage facility.
(9) A safety, security, and emergency response plan describing
measures to ensure:
(A) site security and safety;
(B) coordination with the unit's services; and
(C) safeguarding of the public;
with regard to the construction and operation of the electric
generation or storage facility. If the electric generation or
storage facility will include a utility scale battery energy
storage system, the response plan provided under this
subdivision must include the emergency response plan
required by IC 22-14-8-4(b)(4).
(10) If the electric generation or storage facility will include
a utility scale battery energy storage system, documentation
that the project owner has received approval for the
installation of the utility scale battery energy storage system
from the department of homeland security under
IC 22-14-8-4(d).
(c) Not later than sixty (60) days after a project owner's provision of
the notice under subsection (b), the project owner shall hold a public
hearing in the unit in which the electric generation or storage facility
will be located, during which the project owner shall:
(1) provide information to the public; and
(2) receive public comment;
regarding the electric generation or storage facility and the
construction of the electric generation or storage facility. If an OEO
development will be located on the same premise of land as the
electric generation or storage facility, the project owner and the
development owner may conduct the hearing required by this
subsection as a joint public hearing at which information
concerning both the electric generation or storage facility and the
OEO development is provided to the public, with opportunity for
the public to comment on each proposal. The project owner shall
publish notice of the date, time, location, and subject of the public
hearing in accordance with IC 5-3-1-2(b).
(d) After providing notice to a local authority under subsection (b),
a project owner shall notify the local authority regarding any
substantive changes in the information provided by the project owner
under subsection (b) that occur before construction begins on the
electric generation or storage facility to which the notice pertains.
SECTION 10. IC 8-1-8.2-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) A development owner is
not required to obtain a permit, or any other land use or zoning
approval, from a local authority for the construction of an OEO
development if the development owner complies with subsections
(b) and (c).
(b) Not later than two hundred seventy (270) days before
beginning construction of the OEO development, the development
owner shall provide notice of the construction to the local authority
with planning authority under IC 36-7 for the premise of land on
which the construction will occur. The notice must include the
following information with regard to the construction and the OEO
development to be constructed:
(1) A comprehensive description of the OEO development,
including the following:
(A) A description of the water saving technologies
described in section 3.5(2) of this chapter that the OEO
development will be equipped with, or make use of,
including an estimate of the amount of water that will be
saved as a result of the technology.
(B) The anticipated electricity demand of the OEO
development upon its full commercial operation, including
the amount of that demand that will be supplied by:
(i) the electric generation or storage facility that will be
located on the same premise of land, in accordance with
the agreement or arrangement described in section 3.5(3)
of this chapter; and
(ii) the incumbent electricity supplier whose assigned
service area under IC 8-1-2.3 includes the premise of
land on which the OEO development will be located, as
applicable.
If any amount of the OEO development's anticipated
electricity demand will be supplied by the incumbent
electricity supplier described in item (ii), the development
owner shall indicate whether the development owner has
entered into a service contract with the electricity supplier
or otherwise received confirmation from the electricity
supplier that the electricity supplier will be able to supply
the amount of the OEO development's anticipated
electricity demand set forth in item (ii).
(2) The expected date on which the construction of the OEO
development will begin.
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


(3) The expected date on which the OEO development will
begin commercial operation.
(4) A summary of the economic development agreement
described in section 3.5 of this chapter, including information
as to the expected economic effect of the OEO development on
the unit within which the OEO development will be located,
including the following, as applicable:
(A) The anticipated number and types of jobs to be
created:
(i) during the construction of the OEO development; and
(ii) in the operation of the OEO development.
(B) The estimated property tax revenue the OEO
development will produce for the unit.
(C) An estimate of the overall:
(i) cost to the unit; and
(ii) effect on the unit's revenue;
associated with the OEO development.
(c) Not later than sixty (60) days after a development owner's
provision of the notice under subsection (b), the development
owner shall hold a public hearing in the unit in which the OEO
development will be located, during which the project owner shall:
(1) provide information to the public; and
(2) receive public comment;
regarding the OEO development and the construction of the OEO
development. The development owner and the project owner for
the electric generation or storage facility that will supply all or
part of the OEO development's anticipated electricity demand may
conduct the hearing required by this subsection as a joint public
hearing at which information concerning both the OEO
development and the electric generation or storage facility is
provided to the public, with opportunity for the public to comment
on both proposals. The development owner, or the project owner
in the case of a joint public hearing, shall publish notice of the date,
time, location, and subject of the public hearing in accordance with
IC 5-3-1-2(b).
(d) After providing notice to a local authority under subsection
(b), a development owner shall notify the local authority regarding
any substantive changes in the information provided by the
development owner under subsection (b) that occur before
construction begins on the OEO development to which the notice
pertains.
SECTION 11. IC 8-1-8.2-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2025,
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. This chapter may not be construed to increase
or modify the authority of a local authority or a unit to regulate the
siting, construction, or deployment of an electric generation or storage
facility that is not located in an energy production zone.
SECTION 12. IC 34-13-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A governmental entity or an
employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment is not
liable if a loss results from the following:
(1) The natural condition of unimproved property.
(2) The condition of a reservoir, dam, canal, conduit, drain, or
similar structure when used by a person for a purpose that is not
foreseeable.
(3) The temporary condition of a public thoroughfare or extreme
sport area that results from weather.
(4) The condition of an unpaved road, trail, or footpath, the
purpose of which is to provide access to a recreation or scenic
area.
(5) The design, construction, control, operation, or normal
condition of an extreme sport area, if all entrances to the extreme
sport area are marked with:
(A) a set of rules governing the use of the extreme sport area;
(B) a warning concerning the hazards and dangers associated
with the use of the extreme sport area; and
(C) a statement that the extreme sport area may be used only
by persons operating extreme sport equipment.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain extreme
sports areas in a reasonably safe condition.
(6) The initiation of a judicial or an administrative proceeding.
(7) The performance of a discretionary function; however, the
provision of medical or optical care as provided in IC 34-6-2.1-54
shall be considered as a ministerial act.
(8) The adoption and enforcement of or failure to adopt or
enforce:
(A) a law (including rules and regulations); or
(B) in the case of a public school or charter school, a policy;
unless the act of enforcement constitutes false arrest or false
imprisonment.
(9) An act or omission performed in good faith and without
malice under the apparent authority of a statute which is invalid
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


if the employee would not have been liable had the statute been
valid.
(10) The act or omission of anyone other than the governmental
entity or the governmental entity's employee.
(11) The issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of, or failure
or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any permit, license,
certificate, approval, order, or similar authorization, where the
authority is discretionary under the law.
(12) Failure to make an inspection, or making an inadequate or
negligent inspection, of any property, other than the property of
a governmental entity, to determine whether the property
complied with or violates any law or contains a hazard to health
or safety.
(13) Entry upon any property where the entry is expressly or
impliedly authorized by law.
(14) Misrepresentation if unintentional.
(15) Theft by another person of money in the employee's official
custody, unless the loss was sustained because of the employee's
own negligent or wrongful act or omission.
(16) Injury to the property of a person under the jurisdiction and
control of the department of correction if the person has not
exhausted the administrative remedies and procedures provided
by section 7 of this chapter.
(17) Injury to the person or property of a person under supervision
of a governmental entity and who is:
(A) on probation;
(B) assigned to an alcohol and drug services program under
IC 12-23, a minimum security release program under
IC 11-10-8, a pretrial conditional release program under
IC 35-33-8, or a community corrections program under
IC 11-12; or
(C) subject to a court order requiring the person to be escorted
by a county police officer while on or in a government
building (as defined in IC 36-9-13-3) owned by a county
building authority under IC 36-9-13, unless the injury is the
result of an act or omission amounting to:
(i) gross negligence;
(ii) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(iii) intentional misconduct.
(18) Design of a highway (as defined in IC 9-13-2-73), toll road
project (as defined in IC 8-15-2-4(4)), tollway (as defined in
IC 8-15-3-7), or project (as defined in IC 8-15.7-2-14) if the
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


claimed loss occurs at least twenty (20) years after the public
highway, toll road project, tollway, or project was designed or
substantially redesigned; except that this subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve a responsible governmental entity from the
continuing duty to provide and maintain public highways in a
reasonably safe condition.
(19) Development, adoption, implementation, operation,
maintenance, or use of an enhanced emergency communication
system.
(20) Injury to a student or a student's property by an employee of
a school corporation if the employee is acting reasonably under a:
(A) discipline policy adopted under IC 20-33-8-12; or
(B) restraint and seclusion plan adopted under IC 20-20-40-14.
(21) An act or omission performed in good faith under the
apparent authority of a court order described in IC 35-46-1-15.1
or IC 35-46-1-15.3 that is invalid, including an arrest or
imprisonment related to the enforcement of the court order, if the
governmental entity or employee would not have been liable had
the court order been valid.
(22) An act taken to investigate or remediate hazardous
substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
brownfield (as defined in IC 13-11-2-19.3) unless:
(A) the loss is a result of reckless conduct; or
(B) the governmental entity or the private or nonprofit
entity described in IC 5-1.2-12-4(g) was responsible for the
initial placement of the hazardous substances, petroleum, or
other pollutants on the brownfield.
(23) The operation of an off-road vehicle (as defined in
IC 14-8-2-185) by a nongovernmental employee, or by a
governmental employee not acting within the scope of the
employment of the employee, on a public highway in a county
road system outside the corporate limits of a city or town, unless
the loss is the result of an act or omission amounting to:
(A) gross negligence;
(B) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(C) intentional misconduct.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain highways
in a reasonably safe condition for the operation of motor vehicles
licensed by the bureau of motor vehicles for operation on public
highways.
(24) Any act or omission rendered in connection with a request,
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


investigation, assessment, or opinion provided under
IC 36-9-28.7.
(b) This subsection applies to a cause of action that accrues during
a period of a state disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19, if the state of disaster emergency was declared
after February 29, 2020, and before April 1, 2022. A governmental
entity or an employee acting within the scope of the employee's
employment is not liable for an act or omission arising from COVID-19
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentional misrepresentation. If a claim
described in this subsection is:
(1) a claim for injury or death resulting from medical malpractice;
and
(2) not barred by the immunity provided under this subsection;
the claimant is required to comply with all of the provisions of
IC 34-18 (medical malpractice act).
SECTION 13. IC 36-7-4-201.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 201.5. (a) As used in this section,
"permitted use" means a use that is approved in a zoning district
without requiring a:
(1) public hearing;
(2) variance, special exception, contingent use, or conditional
use; or
(3) discretionary zoning action, other than a determination
that a site plan conforms with applicable zoning regulations.
(b) Notwithstanding any ordinance or regulation to the
contrary, a project or development is a permitted use if the project
or development is sited on land:
(1) zoned for agricultural use; and
(2) comprised of soil in capability classes IV, V, VI, VII, or
VIII as identified in the land capability classification system
of the United States Department of Agriculture Natural
Resources Conservation Service.
SECTION 14. IC 36-7-4-305.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 305.5. (a) As used in this section,
"petition" has the meaning set forth in section 400.5 of this
chapter.
(b) Any person wishing to speak at a plan commission hearing
regarding a petition may be required, as a condition of speaking,
to provide the person's name and address in writing.
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


(c) The presiding officer of the plan commission may, in
managing the conduct of a hearing, give consideration to whether
a person:
(1) is a resident of the county; or
(2) has an interest as an owner, lessor, lessee, or life tenant in
real property located within the county;
in deciding the order in which persons may speak and the amount
of time allotted to each speaker.
(d) A presiding officer may allot persons who are described in
subsection (c) more time to speak at the hearing than persons who
are not described in subsection (c).
SECTION 15. IC 36-7-4-400.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 400.5. (a) As used in this section,
"petition" means a petition concerning any of the following:
(1) A plat, including the vacation of a plat.
(2) A development plan.
(3) A variance, contingent use, conditional use, special
exception, or special use.
(4) A planned unit development.
(5) A comprehensive plan.
(6) A zoning ordinance.
The term includes an administrative appeal of a decision regarding
a petition.
(b) Any person wishing to speak at a public hearing of the
legislative body regarding a petition may be required, as a
condition of speaking, to provide the person's name and address in
writing.
(c) The presiding officer of the legislative body may, in
managing the conduct of a public hearing, give consideration to
whether a person:
(1) is a resident of the county; or
(2) has an interest as an owner, lessor, lessee, or life tenant in
real property located within the county;
in deciding the order in which persons may speak and the amount
of time allotted to each speaker.
(d) A presiding officer may allot persons who are described in
subsection (c) more time to speak at the public hearing than
persons who are not described in subsection (c).
SECTION 16. IC 36-7-4-920.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 920.5. (a) As used in this section,
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87


"petition" has the meaning set forth in section 400.5 of this
chapter.
(b) Any person wishing to speak at a public hearing of the board
of zoning appeals regarding a petition may be required, as a
condition of speaking, to provide the person's name and address in
writing.
(c) The presiding officer of the board of zoning appeals may, in
managing the conduct of a public hearing, give consideration to
whether a person:
(1) is a resident of the county; or
(2) has an interest as an owner, lessor, lessee, or life tenant in
real property located within the county;
in deciding the order in which persons may speak and the amount
of time allotted to each speaker.
(d) A presiding officer may allot persons who are described in
subsection (c) more time to speak at the public hearing than
persons who are not described in subsection (c).
2026 IN 1333—LS 7025/DI 87